Utah statutes.
11-40-102.   Criminal background check authorized -- Written notice required.

(1)  A public water utility may:

(a)  require an applicant to submit to a criminal background check as a condition of employment;

(b)  periodically require existing employees of the public water utility to submit to a criminal background check if, in the judgment of the public water utility, the employee is in a position to affect the safety or security of the publicly owned treatment works or public water system or to affect the safety or well-being of patrons of the public water utility; and

(c)  require a person seeking access to submit to a criminal background check as a condition of acquiring access.

(2) (a)  Each applicant, person seeking access, and existing employee described in Subsection (1)(b) shall, if required by the public water utility:

(i)  submit a fingerprint card in a form acceptable to the division; and

(ii)  consent to a fingerprint background check by:

(A)  the Utah Bureau of Criminal Identification; and

(B)  the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(b)  If requested by a public water utility, the division shall request the Department of Public Safety to complete a Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal background check for each applicant, person seeking access, or existing employee through a national criminal history system.

(c) (i)  A public water utility may make an applicant's employment with the public water utility or the access of a person seeking access conditional pending completion of a criminal background check under this section.

(ii)  If a criminal background check discloses that an applicant or a person seeking access failed to disclose accurately a criminal history, the public water utility may deny or, if conditionally given, immediately terminate the applicant's employment or the person's access.

(iii)  If an applicant or person seeking access accurately disclosed the relevant criminal history and the criminal background check discloses that the applicant or person seeking access has been convicted of a crime that indicates a potential risk for the safety of the public water utility's public water system or publicly owned treatment works or for the safety or well-being of patrons of the public water utility, the public water utility may deny or, if conditionally given, immediately terminate the applicant's employment or the person's access.

(3)  Each public water utility that requests a criminal background check under Subsection (1) shall prepare criteria for which criminal activity will preclude employment and shall provide written notice to the person who is the subject of the criminal background check that the background check has been requested.

